Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2283
Collateral payment; effect; setoff.

The court shall not impose restitution for a loss for which the victim has received compensation, except that the court may order payment by the defendant to any person who has compensated the victim to the extent that such compensation has been provided. Any amount paid to a victim pursuant to an order of restitution shall be set off against any amount later recovered as compensatory damages in a civil action.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 4.

An insurance company which makes payments to a victim is included under the term "person" found in this section. State v. Holecek, 260 Neb. 976, 621 N.W.2d 100 (2000).